Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WOOD UPCYCLING CAMPUS.new text end new text begin $23,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Nursery and Landscape Association to construct a wood upcycling campus to process wood waste into lumber, furniture, building materials, and other wood products; compost, mulch, and biochar; and energy production. new text end